Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.050

Trafficking in stolen property in the first degree.

(1) A person who knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs, manages, or supervises the theft of property for sale to others, or who knowingly traffics in stolen property, is guilty of trafficking in stolen property in the first degree.

(2) Trafficking in stolen property in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2003 c 53 s 86; 2001 c 222 s 8. Prior: 1984 c 270 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.